Wyoming, session 2025, HB0315.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-301.1 is created to read:

21-2-301.1. State board of education and the state
board of career and technical education reorganization
under the state superintendent of public instruction.

HB0315

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0456
(a) Subject to approval of the reorganization plan by
act of the legislature pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section and notwithstanding W.S. 21-2-301 et seq., not
later than July 1, 2026, all divisions, programs and
functions of the state board of education and the state
board of career and technical education shall be
transferred to the state superintendent of public
instruction. On and after July 1, 2026, any statute, rule
or legal or other document that refers to the state board
of education or the state board of career and technical
education shall mean the state superintendent of public
instruction.

(b) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall prepare a plan for reorganization of the state board
of education and the state board of career and technical
education under the state superintendent. The
reorganization plan shall:

(i) Maintain the current structure and operation
of the state board of education and the state board of
career and technical education to the maximum extent
practicable, while ensuring all divisions, programs and
HB0315

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0456
functions of the state board of education and the state
board of career and technical education are assigned to the
state superintendent upon adoption of the reorganization
plan by the legislature;

(ii) Require the state superintendent to perform
the administrative functions assigned by this section. The
state superintendent may appoint administrators and
managers who may serve as the administrative heads of
divisions and programs created by the state superintendent
for the purpose of executing the functions assigned by this
section;

(iii) Identify statutory amendments, rule and
procedural amendments and other regulatory amendments that
will be necessary to accomplish the reorganization required
by this section;

(iv) Provide for the transfer of all personnel,
supplies, equipment and appropriations of and for the state
board of education and the state board of career and
technical education to the state superintendent;

HB0315

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0456
(v) Identify any other issues or factors
relevant to the reorganization required by this section.

(c) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall submit the reorganization plan required by subsection
(b) of this section to the governor, the joint
appropriations committee and the joint education interim
committee on or before July 1, 2025. The state
superintendent shall make the plan available to the public
on or before July 1, 2025. The joint appropriations
committee and the joint education interim committee shall
each hold at least one (1) public hearing regarding the
reorganization plan before convening of the legislature for
the 2026 budget session and may draft appropriate
legislation utilizing the reorganization plan for
introduction for the 2026 budget session. It is the intent
of the legislature that the reorganization plan be
implemented not later than July 1, 2026.

(d) Unless otherwise directed in an approved
reorganization plan, the duties, powers and functions of
the state board of education and the state board of career
and technical education shall remain unchanged until July
HB0315

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0456
1, 2026, after which time the state superintendent shall be
the successor to the state board of education and the state
board of career and technical education.

Section 2. W.S. 21-2-202 by creating a new subsection
(j) is amended to read:

21-2-202. Duties of the state superintendent.

(j) The state superintendent of public instruction
shall prepare the reorganization plan required by W.S.
21-2-301.1. Upon approval of the reorganization plan by act
of the legislature, the state superintendent shall perform
the functions required by the reorganization plans and the
state superintendent shall serve as the successor to the
state board of education and the state board of career and
technical education. Nothing in this subsection prohibits
the legislature from adopting any reorganization plan in
whole or in part.

Section 3. The validity of rules, regulations,
contracts, amendments or other obligations of the state
board of education and the state board of career and
HB0315

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0456
technical education are not affected by this act. The rules
and regulations of the state board of education and the
state board of career and technical education shall remain
in effect until amended or repealed by rules and
regulations adopted by the state superintendent following
approval by the legislature of the reorganization plan
required by W.S. 21-2-301.1(b).

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0315